Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,109
Violations of act; action to enjoin.

Whenever, in the judgment of the department, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to the act, the Attorney General or county attorney may apply to the district court for an order enjoining such acts or practices or for an order directing compliance. Upon a showing by the department that such person has engaged or is about to engage in any such acts or practices, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order may be granted.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 32.